Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-302 Applicability and
scope. (a) Notwithstanding any provision in this part to the contrary,
this part shall apply to:

(1) All medicare supplement policies delivered or
issued for delivery in this State; and

(2) All certificates issued under group medicare
supplement policies, which certificates have been delivered or issued for
delivery in this State.

(b) This part shall not apply to a policy of
one or more employers or labor organizations, or of the trustees of a fund
established by one or more employers or labor organizations, or combination
thereof, for employees or former employees, or combination thereof, or for
members or former members, or combination thereof, of the labor organizations.

(c) The commissioner shall have all rights and
powers with respect to the group or master policy and certificate issued
pursuant to the medicare supplement policy as if the group or master policy was
issued and delivered to a person domiciled in this State.

(d) Except as otherwise specifically provided
in section 431:10A-307(d), this part is not intended to prohibit or apply to
insurance policies or health care benefit plans including group conversion
policies, issued to medicare eligible persons that are not marketed or held to
be medicare supplement policies or benefit plans. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am
L 1989, c 207, §11; am L 1990, c 84, §2; am L 1992, c 195, §2; am L 1996, c 28,
§2; am L 2004, c 122, §34]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next